src/pron-kom-morph.txt
LEXICON PRON-HUM-OBL
! 2000: 187
+Cmpl: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Gen:лӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Abl:лысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Dat:лы INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Acc:ӧс INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Acc3:сӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Instr:ӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Com:кӧд INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Car:тӧг INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Cns:ла INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ine:ын INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ela:ысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; 
+Ill:ӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Apr:лань INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Egr:сянь INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Tra:ті INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ter:ӧдз INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL
+Coll:нан PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
+ZeroColl: PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
!
+ZeroColl+PxPl2+Acc2:ныдтӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Coll+PxPl2+Acc2:наннытӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS
+PxPl1:ным PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl2:ныд PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl3:ныс PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
!
+PxPl1+Acc:нымӧс INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+PxPl2+Acc2:нытӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+PxPl3+Acc3:ныссӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES
+Nom: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
 PRON-HUM-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-NONHUM
+Nom: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Gen:лӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Abl:лысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Dat:лы INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+ZeroAcc: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Acc3:сӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Instr:ӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Com:кӧд INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Car:тӧг INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Comp:ся INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Cns:ла INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ine:ын INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ela:ысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; 
+Ill:ӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Apr:лань INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Egr:сянь INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Prl:ӧд INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Tra:ті INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ter:ӧдз INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

!!Removing 2012-02-08 The comparative can be taken care of once
! LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF_COMPARISON
! +Der/джык+Compar:%>джык INTERR-REL ;
!               INTERR-REL ;

LEXICON Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON EgrIll4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Egr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Tra4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Pron+Tra: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON TraEgr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Tra+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Ter4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ter: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF ! 3 types of pronouns are congregated here
 PRON-INDEFTAG ; ! This leads to a variety of indefinite pronouns
 INTERR-REL ; ! This leads to a split between relative and interrogative pronouns

LEXICON INTERR-REL
+Interr: COMPARATIVE ;
+Rel: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEFTAG
+Der/кӧ+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ;


! Indefinite pronouns
 
LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG
+Pron+Indef: # ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG-KO
+Pron: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX
+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Abl:%>лысь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Dat:%>лы PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Instr:%>ӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Ela:%>ысь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Egr:%>сянь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END
+Der/кӧ+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ; !Basically both endings can be used for deriving 
                     !indefinite pronouns from the interrogative/relative pronouns.


LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-KO
+Pron+Der/кӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO
+Pron+Der/сюрӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INTERR
+Pron+Interr: K ;

!!LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-END
!!+Der/сюрӧ:%>сюрӧ # ;

!!LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO
!!+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!!+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!!+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!!+Dat:%>лы PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!!!!+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;


LEXICON PRON-SPAT
+Pron+Spat: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR
+Pron+Recipr: PRON-RECIPR-CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR-CASE
+Cmpl: # ;
+PxSg2+Cmpl:ыд K ;
+PxSg2+Cmpl:ыс K ;
+PxPl1+Cmpl:ным K ;
+PxPl2+Cmpl:ныд K ;
+PxPl3+Cmpl:ныс K ;
+Gen:лӧн K ;
+PxSg3+Abl:ыслысь K ;
+PxPl3+Abl:ныслысь K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+PxSg3+Dat:ыслы K ;
+PxPl3+Dat:ныслы K ;
+Acc:ӧс K ;
+PxPl1+Acc:нымӧс K ;
+PxPl2+Acc2:нытӧ K ;
+PxPl3+Acc3:ныссӧ K ;
+Acc3:сӧ K ;
+PxSg3+Com:ыскӧд K ;
+PxPl2+Com:ныдкӧд K ;
+PxPl3+Com:ныскӧд K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
+Ela:ысь K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+PxSg3+Ill:ас K ; ! Here is a good problem: Should there be a special tag
                ! for the illative-inessive forms
+PxPl3+Ill:нысӧ K ;


LEXICON PRON-REL
+Pron+Rel: # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR
+Pron+Refl+Der/ладор: Noun1 ; !2011-11-22

LEXICON EndRefl
+Pron+Refl+Abs: # ; !ас is an absolute-form modifer
 PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES
+Ela+PxSg1:сьым K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:сьыд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:сьыным K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+Abl:сьынымлысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+Ela:сьынымысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:сьыныд K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+Dat+PxSg1:лым K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:лыд K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:лыс K ;
+Dat+PxPl1:лыным K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:лыныд K ;
+Dat+PxPl2+Dat:лыныдлы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:лыныс K ;
+Dat+PxPl3+Dat:лыныслы K ;
+PxPl3+Dat:ныслы K ;
+Sg1+Instr:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Pl3
+Pl3+Instr:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Pl3
+Instr+PxSg1+Instr:намӧн K ;
+Instr+PxSg2:над K ;
+Instr+PxSg3:нас K ;
+Instr+PxPl1:наным K ;
+Instr+PxPl2:наныд K ;
+Instr+PxPl3:наныс K ;
+Sg1+Com:кӧд K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Com+PxSg2:кӧдыд K ; !
+Com+PxSg3:кӧдыс K ; !
+Com+PxPl1:кӧдным K ; !
+Com+PxPl2:кӧдныд K ; !
+PxPl2+Com:ныдкӧд K ; !
+Com+PxPl3:кӧдныс K ; !
+PxPl3+Com:ныскӧд K ; !
+Sg1+Car:тӧг K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Car+PxSg2:тӧгыд K ; !
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ; !
+Car+PxPl1:тӧгным K ; !
+Car+PxPl2:тӧгныд K ; !
+PxPl2+Car:ныдтӧг K ; !
+Car+PxPl3:тӧгныс K ; !
+PxPl3+Car:ныстӧг K ; !
+Sg1+Cons:ла K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Cons+PxSg2:лаыд K ;
+PxSg2+Cons:ыдла K ;
+PxSg3+Cons:ысла K ;
+PxPl2+Cons:ныдла K ;
+PxPl3+Cons:нысла K ;
+Ine+PxSg2:ад K ;
+Ine+PxSg3:ас K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:аным K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:аныд K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:аныс K ;
+Sg1+Ill:ӧ K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ill+PxSg1:ам K ; !Ӧнія коми кыв gives this for illative only
+Ill+PxSg2:ад K ; !
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1:аным K ; !
+Ill+PxPl2:аныд K ; !
+Ill+PxPl3:аныс K ; !
+Sg1+Apr:лань K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:ланьным K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ланьныд K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ланьныс K ;
+Sg1+Egr:сянь K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:сяньныс K ;
+Sg1+Tra:ті K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Tra+PxSg2:тіыд K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
! Pl1 and Pl2 are not attested in Ӧнія коми кыв
+Tra+PxPl3:тіныс K ;
+Sg1+Ter:ӧдз K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ter+PxSg2:ӧдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:ӧдзыс K ;
+PxPl1+Ter:нымӧдз K ;
+PxPl2+Ter:ныдӧдз K ;
+PxPl3+Ter:нысӧдз K ;
!Extras 2011-10-07


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Nom: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Acc:ӧс # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Instr:ӧн # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Com:кӧд # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Car:тӧг # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Ine:ын # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Ela:ысь # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg1+Ill:ӧ # ;


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg1: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg1+Com:кӧд # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg1+Egr:сянь # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg2: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg2+Car:тӧг # ;
+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg2+Ela:ысь # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg2: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg2+Erg:сянь # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-ACC
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Acc2: # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+PxSg2+Instr:ӧн # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+PxSg2+Com:кӧд # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+PxSg2+Car:тӧг # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+PxSg2+Ela:ысь # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg3: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg3+Gen:лӧн # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg3+Ine:ӧ # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-ACC
+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Acc3: # ;

LEXICON INTERR
кин+Pron+Hum+Nom:кин INTERR-REL ; ! 2011-11-09 This will need cases
кодар+Pron+A:кодар INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кодар+Pron+A+Der/MWN:кодар PRON-HUM-OBL ;
кодар+Pron+A+Der/ладор:кодарладор PRON-HUM-OBL ;
кодыр+Pron+Adv+Temp:кодыр INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кор+Pron+Adv+Temp:кор INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кор+Pron+Adv+Temp+Pl+Ill:коръясӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
коръя+Pron+Adv+Temp:коръя INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кудз+Pron+Adv+Manner+Use/Sub:кудз INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кутшӧм+Pron+A:кутшӧм INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! This needs to be 
кутшӧм+Pron+A+Pred+Pl:кутшӧмӧсь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! This needs to be 
кутшӧма+Pron+Adv+Manner:кутшӧма INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! This needs to be 
кутшӧм+Pron+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg:кутшӧм PRON-NONHUM ;
кутшӧм+Pron+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl:кутшӧмъяс PRON-NONHUM ;
кутшӧми+Pron+A:кутшӧми INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! This needs to be 
кыдз+Pron+Adv+Manner:кыдз INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кыдзи+Pron+Adv+Manner:кыдзи INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кыдзик+Pron+Adv+Manner:кыдзик INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кыдзик+Pron+Adv+Manner+Instr:кыдзикӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кымын+Pron+Qnt:кымын INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! Quantifier info required
кымын+Pron+Qnt+Iter:кымынысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! Quantifier info required
кымын+Pron+Qnt+Ord:кымынӧд INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! Quantifier info required
кымын+Pron+Qnt+Ord+Iter:кымынӧдысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; ! Quantifier info required
кысь+Pron+Spat+Ela:кысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кытчӧ+Pron+Spat+Ill:кытчӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кытчӧдз+Pron+Spat+Ter:кытчӧдз INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кытысь+Pron+Spat+Ela:кытысь INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кыті+Pron+Spat+Tra:кыті INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кытӧн+Pron+Spat+Ine:кытӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кытӧні+Pron+Spat+Ine:кытӧні INTERR-REL ;
кӧні+Pron+Adv+Spat+Ine+Pred+Sg:кӧні INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
кӧні+Pron+Adv+Spat+Ine+Pred+Pl:кӧнӧсь INTERR-REL ;
кӧні+Pron+Adv+Spat+Ine:кӧн PRON-INDEFTAG ;
мый+Pron+NonHum:мый PRON-NONHUM ;
мыйда+Pron+NonHum:мыйда INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
мыйта+Pron+NonHum:мыйта INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
мыйтӧм+Pron+NonHum:мыйтӧм INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
мыйӧс+Pron+NonHum+Use/Sub:мыйӧс INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
